Vermont, session 2025-2026, H274.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 1852 is amended to read:
§ 1852. PATIENTS’ BILL OF RIGHTS; ADOPTION
(a) The General Assembly hereby adopts the “Bill of Rights for Hospital
Patients” as follows:
VT LEG #380744 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.274
2025 Page 2 of 2
* * *
(19) The patient has the right not to be denied admission, care, or
services based solely on the patient’s vaccination status.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380744 v.1